Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

General Provisions

54-2-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-2-101 (Acts 1919, ch. 149, § 10; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b10; Code 1932, § 3179; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-201), concerning appropriation to the highway fund of automobile license and registration taxes and penalties, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 3. For current law, see § 55-6-107.

54-2-102. Custody of department of transportation funds.

All funds, revenues, taxes and proceeds of notes or bond issues that are now or may be hereafter devoted or allocated to the department of transportation shall be placed in the custody of the state treasurer in an account to be known as the “department of transportation state highway fund” or “highway fund.”

Acts 1931 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3196.1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-202; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2009, ch. 197, § 2.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added “in an account to be known as the ‘department of transportation state highway fund’ or ‘highway fund’” to the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 197, § 4. July 1, 2009.

Collateral References. 39 Am. Jur. 2d Highways, Streets, and Bridges § 137 et seq.

40 C.J.S. Highways § 176.

Highways
97.1 et seq.

54-2-103. Department of transportation funds to be kept separate — Manner of drawing out.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department of transportation state highway fund shall be kept separate and apart from all other funds; and, except as authorized by § 47-18-1311, no part shall be transferred or otherwise diverted to any other department or agency of state government and shall only be drawn out of the state treasury as provided in §§ 54-2-104 and 54-2-105.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 1; Shan., § 1720a29b1; Acts 1919, ch. 188, § 1; 1923, ch. 62, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b39; Code 1932, § 3196; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-203; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2009, ch. 197, § 3.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section which read: “All of the funds of the department of transportation shall be kept separate and apart from all other funds, and no part shall be diverted to any other branch of the state government, and shall only be drawn out of the state treasury as provided in §§ 54-2-104 and 54-2-105.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 197, § 4. July 1, 2009.

54-2-104. Disbursement of department of transportation funds — Voucher-warrant — Preparation and form.

Upon the receipt by the commissioner of transportation of any project estimate, account or other item of disbursement other than payroll payments, it shall be the duty of the commissioner to prepare a voucher-warrant for the amount for which the commissioner approves the account, project estimate or other disbursement, payable to the party entitled to the disbursement, and approved by the commissioner. The voucher-warrant shall be transmitted to the commissioner of finance and administration, together with the statement of account, estimate or other disbursement the commissioner may require, and when the voucher-warrant has been approved by the commissioner of finance and administration in accordance with law, the commissioner of finance and administration shall sign the voucher-warrant and shall deliver the voucher-warrant to the department of transportation for transmission to the party entitled to the voucher-warrant. When made out by the commissioner of transportation, the voucher-warrant shall contain the project number for which it is drawn and other memoranda or data the commissioner of transportation may deem requisite for purposes of identification and record. Upon presentation of the voucher-warrant, when properly signed by the commissioner of finance and administration and the commissioner of transportation, it shall be the duty of the state treasurer to pay the voucher-warrant.

Acts 1931 (2nd E.S.), ch. 7, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3196.2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-204; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-2-105. Payroll accounts — Depository bond.

When, in the course of the work of the department of transportation, the commissioner of transportation finds it necessary to make payments of salaries or personal expenses, or both, now authorized by law to the personnel of the department, in all cases except where an appropriation for salaries and expenses and/or wages is made by the general appropriations act, the commissioner shall prepare in duplicate payrolls and/or expense accounts, showing in detail the payments due to each and every employee of the department, properly itemizing all expense accounts, which payrolls and expense accounts may be in one (1) document or in several, at the discretion of the commissioner. The original of the payrolls shall be filed in the department and a duplicate copy of the payrolls shall be certified by the commissioner as being correct, and the commissioner shall then draw a voucher-warrant for the total amount of the payroll or payrolls, and the voucher-warrant, when found to be correct by the commissioner of finance and administration, shall be signed by the commissioner of finance and administration. Upon presentation of the voucher-warrant to the state treasurer, it shall be the state treasurer's duty to pay the voucher-warrant and to deposit the proceeds of the voucher-warrant into a state depository the state treasurer selects, the voucher-warrant to be deposited to the credit of the commissioner of transportation, payroll account. The commissioner of transportation may then draw checks payable to the order of the respective parties to whom the salaries, wages and/or expenses may be due for the amounts due each. The payrolls, when in possession of the state depository designated by the state treasurer, shall be protected by the regular depository bond. All checks drawn by the commissioner of transportation on the payroll account shall be segregated month by month and preserved for a period of twelve (12) months and, at the expiration of the twelve-month period, the commissioner of transportation may transfer the checks to the archives of the state.

Acts 1931 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3196.3; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-205; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-2-106, 54-2-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-2-106, 54-2-107 (Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 2; 1919, ch. 149, § 21; Shan., § 1720a29b5; Acts 1923, ch. 62, § 2; Shan. Supp., §§ 1720a7b21, 1720a29b7; Code 1932, §§ 3184, 3198; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 54-206, 54-207), concerning the use of highway bureau (now department of transportation) funds, were repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 3. For public finances generally, see title 9.

54-2-108. Short-term notes — Issuance in anticipation of collections to start construction of any project.

The commissioner of finance and administration and state treasurer shall anticipate the collection of highway funds, and issue short-term notes when requested by the department of transportation, to start the construction or reconstruction of any project that has been accepted by an officer or agency of the federal government, as provided in any act of congress granting funds for the construction of roads, and as provided in this chapter and chapters 1 and 5 of this title.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 11; Shan., § 1720a29b44 (p. 6553); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b75; Code 1932, § 3235; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-208; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-2-109 — 54-2-112. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-2-109 — 54-2-112 (Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 10; 1919, ch. 149, § 8; 1929 (E.S.), ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 1720a29b43; Shan. Supp., §§ 1720a7b8, 1720a7b74; Code 1932, §§ 3177, 3234, 3236, 3237; Acts 1978, ch. 910, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 54-209 — 54-212), concerning rentals from state-owned property and contribution and participation of counties and individuals, were repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 3. For public finances generally, see title 9.